Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1160.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. There is hereby appropriated to the Prison
Acquisition Revolving Fund created in Enrolled House Bill No. 2780
of the 1st Session of the 60th Oklahoma Legislature, from any monies
not otherwise appropriated from the Revenue Stabilization Fund of
the State Treasury, the sum of Two Hundred Thirty-eight Million
Seventy-seven Thousand Four Hundred Sixty-two Dollars
($238,077,462.00) for expenditure by law.
SECTION 2. There is hereby appropriated to the Prison
Acquisition Revolving Fund created in Enrolled House Bill No. 2780
of the 1st Session of the 60th Oklahoma Legislature, from any monies
not otherwise appropriated from the General Revenue Fund of the
State Treasury for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2023, the sum of
Seventy-three Million Nine Hundred Twenty-two Thousand Five Hundred
Thirty-eight Dollars ($73,922,538.00) for expenditure by law.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

Passed the Senate the 20th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 22nd day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1160 Page 2